Maine, session 132, LD1675.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3136, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 644, §3, is further
amended to read:
1. Land necessary for location of transmission lines carrying 5,000 volts. Subject
to approval by the commission under subsection 4 and the requirements of subsection 6
6-A, if applicable, a transmission and distribution utility may take and hold by right of
eminent domain lands and easements necessary for the proper location of its transmission
lines that are designed to carry voltages of 5,000 volts or more and of necessary
appurtenances, located within the territory in which the utility is authorized to do public
utility business, in the same manner and under the same conditions as set forth in chapter
65. Notwithstanding section 6501, subsection 1 and section 6507, subsection 4, owners are
entitled to damages for all property taken by eminent domain in accordance with subsection
5 6-A.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3136, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 644, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3136, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 644, §6, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3136, sub-§6-A is enacted to read:
6-A. Owner entitled to damages. The owner of a property taken by eminent domain
by a transmission and distribution utility for the construction, rebuilding or relocation of a
transmission line is entitled to damages to be paid by the transmission and distribution
utility in the form of an annual installment over the course of 20 years from the operation
date of the transmission line. The transmission and distribution utility shall set aside 1% of
the total revenue generated from the construction, rebuilding or relocation of a transmission
line annually to be paid as damages to the owner of a property taken by eminent domain
for the construction, rebuilding or relocation of that transmission line. The 1% of the
revenue set aside for damages must be distributed to property owners based on the acres of
property taken from that owner for the construction, rebuilding or relocation of the
transmission line.
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3136, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 644, §8, is repealed.